Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1499.06
Nebraska Environmental Trust Board; abstention; when.

Any member of the Nebraska Environmental Trust Board who is also a director of a state agency shall abstain from voting on applications pursuant to the Nebraska Environmental Trust Act which would provide funding primarily to his or her agency.

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 36.

Nebraska Environmental Trust Act, see section 81-15,167.